it: Tipo di sospensione del telaio: Sospensione completa; Hardtail; Rigida; Altro
fr: Type de suspension du cadre: Suspension complète; Semi-rigide; Rigide; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta ovjesa okvira: Puna suspenzija; Hardtail; Kruta; Ostalo
lt-LT: Rėmo pakabos tipas: Pilna amortizacija; Su priekine amortizacija (Hardtail); Be amortizacijos (Rigid); Kita
fi: Runkojousituksen tyyppi: Täysjousto; Jäykkäperä; Jäykkä; Muu
ja: Frameサスペンションタイプ: フルサスペンション; ハードテイル; リジッド; その他
zh-TW: 車架避震類型: 全避震; 單避震 (Hardtail); 硬叉 (Rigid); 其他
ko: 프레임 서스펜션 유형: 풀 서스펜션; 하드테일; 리지드; 기타
sv: Ramens fjädringstyp: Heldämpad; Hardtail; Stel; Övrigt
nb: Suspensjonstype for ramme: Fulldemper; Hardtail; Stiv; Annet
nl: Frame veringstype: Volledige vering; Hardtail; Stijf; Overige
zh-CN: 车架避震类型: 全避震; 硬尾; 硬叉; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta vzmetenja okvirja: Polno vzmetenje; Hardtail; Togo; Drugo
ru: Тип подвески рамы: Двухподвес; Хардтейл; Жесткая; Другое
es: Tipo de suspensión del cuadro: Suspensión completa; Hardtail; Rígida; Otro
de: Art der Rahmenfederung: Vollfederung; Hardtail; Starr; Sonstiges
da: Type af affjedring i ramme: Fuldaffjedret; Hardtail; Stiv; Andet
el: Τύπος ανάρτησης σκελετού: Πλήρης ανάρτηση; Hardtail; Χωρίς ανάρτηση; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип окачване на рамката: Пълно окачване; Hardtail; Твърда; Друго
pl: Typ zawieszenia ramy: Pełne zawieszenie; Hardtail; Sztywna; Inny
vi: Loại hệ thống treo khung: Giảm xóc toàn phần; Hardtail; Cứng; Khác
en: Frame suspension type: Full suspension; Hardtail; Rigid; Other
tr: Frame süspansiyon tipi: Tam süspansiyon; Hardtail; Rijit; Diğer
th: ระบบกันสะเทือน Frame: ฟูลซัสเพนชัน; ฮาร์ดเทล; ตะเกียบ; อื่นๆ
hu: A keret felfüggesztésének típusa: Összteleszkópos; Hardtail; Merev; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul de suspensie cadru: Suspensie completă; Hardtail; Rigid; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de suspensão do quadro: Suspensão total; Hardtail; Rígido; Outro
cs: Typ zavěšení rámu: Celo-odpružený; Hardtail; Pevný; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ zavesenia rámu: Celoodpružené; Hardtail; Pevné; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de suspensão Frame: Suspensão total; Hardtail; Rígido; Outro